Utah statutes.
39-4-11.   Term of force enlistment -- Oaths.
A person may not be enlisted for more than one year, but enlistment may be
renewed.  The oath to be taken upon enlistment in the forces shall be
substantially in the form prescribed for enlisted men of the National Guard,
substituting the words, Utah State Defense Force, where necessary.
